Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-979
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that no General Funds be used in carrying out the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act.

Revenue from the intergovernmental transfer program created under the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act shall be deposited into the Health and Human Services Cash Fund.

Laws 2017, LB578, § 4.